Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1082
Class V school district; school tax; levy.

The aggregate school tax for a Class V school district, including the levy for the site and building fund as authorized by section 79-10,126, shall be subject to the limits provided in section 77-3442.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 22, p. 325;

R.S.1913, § 7028;

Laws 1915, c. 126, § 1, p. 286;

Laws 1917, c. 130, § 1, p. 311;

Laws 1919, c. 147, § 1, p. 329;

Laws 1921, c. 72, § 1, p. 271;

C.S.1922, § 6659;

C.S.1929, § 79-2722;

Laws 1937, c. 176, § 6, p. 696;

Laws 1939, c. 112, § 1, p. 485;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-2723;

R.S.1943, § 79-2723;

Laws 1945, c. 214, § 2, p. 629;

Laws 1947, c. 298, § 2, p. 914;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 265, p. 780;

Laws 1951, c. 285, § 1, p. 951;

Laws 1953, c. 307, § 1, p. 1023;

Laws 1955, c. 320, § 2, p. 989;

Laws 1959, c. 407, § 1, p. 1370;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1007.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 728;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 83;

Laws 2001, LB 711, § 18;

Laws 2003, LB 292, § 16.